Nebraska, session 109, LB396.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-516 A public power district or public power and irrigation district
organized pursuant to Chapter 70, article 6, a rural power district organized
pursuant to Chapter 70, article 8, or any agency created pursuant to sections
18-2426 to 18-2434 shall prepare in writing each year a proposed budget which
shall include at a minimum: Revenue from all sources separately stated as to
each source and expenditures from the prior two years; estimates of the current
year's revenue from all sources separately stated as to each source and
expenditures; and a summary which outlines the fiscal policy of the district or
agency for the period covered by the budget. Such proposed budget shall be
available for inspection by the general public at each district's or agency's
principal headquarters at least seven days prior to the meeting of the board of
directors at which such budget is to be adopted. The budget shall be in a form
approved by the Nebraska Power Review Board.
Notice of the place and time of such meeting of the board of directors
shall be published at least seven days prior to the date set for such meeting
in a newspaper of general circulation within the district or agency. The notice
shall include a statement that the proposed budget is available for public
inspection and the location where it is available. Any changes to the proposed
budget made between the date the proposed budget is made available for public
inspection and the date of the board meeting shall be added to the proposed
budget at the principal headquarters of the district or agency prior to the
board meeting. At such meeting the public shall have an opportunity to testify
before the proposed budget is adopted, and a written record shall be kept of
such meeting. If the adopted budget reflects a change from that shown in the
proposed budget a summary of such changes shall be available for inspection at
the principal headquarters of such district or agency.
Sec. 2. Section 70-623, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
70-623 The fiscal year of the district shall coincide with the calendar
year, except that a district with only one wholesale customer that is a city or
a village may use the same fiscal year as the city or village. The board of
directors, at the close of each year's business, shall cause an audit of the
books, records, and financial affairs of the district to be made by a certified
public accountant or firm of such accountants, who shall be selected by the
district. The audit shall be conducted in the manner prescribed in section
84-304.01. When the audit has been completed, written copies of the audit shall
be placed and kept on file at the principal place of business of the district
and shall be filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Nebraska Power
Review Board within one hundred eighty days after the last day of the
district's fiscal year.
Sec. 3. Original sections 13-516 and 70-623, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-1-